Maine, session 132, LD776.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6602, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2021, c. 759, Pt. D,
§2, is further amended to read:
D. A public school, a special purpose private school that receives publicly funded
students or a private school approved for tuition purposes, as defined in section 1,
subsection 23, that enrolls at least 60% publicly funded students as determined by the
previous year's October and April average enrollment and participates in the National
School Lunch Program in accordance with 7 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 210
(2007) that serves lunch shall provide a student who is eligible for free and reduced-
price meals under paragraph A a meal that meets the requirements of the federal
National School Lunch Program set forth in 7 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 210
(2019) at no cost to the student. The State shall provide to the public school, special
purpose private school or private school approved for tuition purposes funding equal
to the difference between the federal reimbursement for a free lunch and the federal
reimbursement for a reduced-price lunch for each student eligible for a reduced-price
lunch and receiving lunch.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §6602, sub-§1, ¶I, as amended by PL 2021, c. 759, Pt. D, §4,
is further amended to read:
I. A public school, a special purpose private school that receives publicly funded
students or a private school approved for tuition purposes, as defined in section 1,
subsection 23, that enrolls at least 60% publicly funded students as determined by the
previous year's October and April average enrollment and participates in the National
School Lunch Program in accordance with 7 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 210
(2007) that serves lunch shall provide a student who is ineligible for free or reduced-
price meals under paragraph A a meal that meets the requirements of the federal
National School Lunch Program set forth in 7 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 210
(2019) at no cost to the student. The State shall provide to the public school, special
purpose private school or private school approved for tuition purposes funding equal
to the difference between the federal reimbursement for a free lunch and the full price
of the lunch for each student ineligible for a free or reduced-price lunch and receiving
lunch.